src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON adjectives
а% вейкеть:а% вейкеть A_VEJKET1-PL  "" ;
а% изнявиця:а% изнявиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% кавтолдыця:а% кавтолдыця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% кенериця:а% кенериця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% кирдевиця:а% кирдевиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% кунсолыця:а% кунсолыця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% липниця:а% липниця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% мариця:а% мариця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% маштыця:а% маштыця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% неиця:а% неиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% оймавиця:а% оймавиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% пелиця:а% пелиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% симиця:а% симиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% удыця:а% удыця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% чарькодиця:а% чарькодиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% эрявикс:а% эрявикс A_OSH  "" ;
а% якиця:а% якиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
авастневиця:авастневиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
авейкеть:авейкеть A_KIT  "" ;
айгоршка:айгоршка A_KUDO  "" ;
акирдевикс:акирдевикс A_OSH  "" ;
аловведень:аловведень A-IS-GEN  "" ;
амурской:амурской A_RU-OJ  "" ;
анок:анок A_LAK  "valmis" ;
анокставкс:анокставкс A_OSH  "" ;
апак% ёмавт:апак% ёмавт A_KIT  "" ;
апаро:апар A_PANGO  "" ;
арась:арась A_OSH  "" ;
армотьксэв:армотьксэв A_KAL  "" ;
археологической:археологической A_RU-OJ  "" ;
атеевикс:атеевикс A_OSH  "" ;
ашижа:ашижа A_KUDO  "" ;
ашола:ашола A_KUDO  "vaaleahko" ;
аштикс:аштикс A_OSH  "" ;
безэрь:безэрь A_KAL  "" ;
беллетристической:беллетристической A_RU-OJ  "" ;
бойка:бойка A_KUDO  "nopea" ;
ботанической:ботанической A_RU-OJ  "" ;
буравсельме:буравсельм A_TINGE  "" ;
бухляк:бухляк A_LAK  "" ;
ваднень:ваднень A-IS-GEN  "" ;
вадряв:вадряв A_KAL  "" ;
вайгельтеме:вайгельтеме ABE-ADJ  "" ;
валакавт:валакавт A_KIT  "" ;
валдо:валд A_PANGO  "valoisa" ;
валдо-тюжа:валдо-тюжа A_KUDO  "" ;
вальмасельме:вальма#сельм A_TINGE  "" ;
ванстовикс:ванстовикс A_OSH  "" ;
ведев:ведев A_KAL  "vetinen" ;
вейкеть:вейкеть A_VEJKET1-PL  "" ;
велень-сядонь:велень-сядонь A-IS-GEN  "kyläyhteisön" ;
вере% сельме:вере% сельм A_TINGE  "" ;
верек:верек A_LAK  "kostea" ;
вереть-алот:вереть-алот A_KIT  "" ;
верка:верка A_KUDO  "nopea" ;
верьгизсельме:верьгизсельм A_TINGE  "" ;
весельме:весельм A_TINGE  "" ;
виде-паро:виде-пар A_PANGO  "" ;
вирев:вирев A_KAL  "metsäinen" ;
виртеме:виртеме ABE-ADJ  "" ;
вить:вить A_KIT  "oikea" ;
вишкинька:вишкинька A_KUDO  "" ;
всемирно-исторической:всемирно-исторической A_RU-OJ  "" ;
гогосельме:гогосельм A_TINGE  "" ;
гуйсельме:гуйсельм A_TINGE  "" ;
дальневосточной:дальневосточной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
дёкуш:дёкуш A_OSH  "" ;
жабав:жабав A_KAL  "" ;
жаной:жаной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
зелёна:зелёна A_KUDO  "" ;
зыянтомо:зыянтомо ABE-ADJ  "" ;
изволок:изволок A_LAK  "" ;
икельсть-удалсть:икельсть-удалсть A_KIT  "" ;
ильведевксэв:ильведевксэв A_KAL  "" ;
инзенской:инзенской A_RU-OJ  "" ;
исень:исень A-IS-GEN  "eilinen" ;
калов:калов A_KAL  "" ;
кальцяня:кальцяня A_KUDO  "" ;
кандывтеме:кандывтеме ABE-ADJ  "" ;
кевсельме:кевсельм A_TINGE  "" ;
кезэпеке:кезэпек A_TINGE  "" ;
кельгстявикс:кельгстявикс A_OSH  "" ;
кельме:кельм A_TINGE  "kylmä" ;
кельтеме:кельтеме ABE-ADJ  "" ;
кенкшев:кенкшев A_KAL  "" ;
керисельме:керисельм A_TINGE  "" ;
кечкерди:кечкерди A_KUDO  "" ;
килейсельме:килейсельм A_TINGE  "" ;
кинетической:кинетической A_RU-OJ  "" ;
клёш:клёш A_OSH  "" ;
койтеме:койтеме ABE-ADJ  "" ;
комавтонь:комавтонь A-IS-GEN  "" ;
корьмакай:корьмакай A_KAL  "" ;
коськата:коськата A_KUDO  "" ;
крёстной:крёстной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
кснавсельме:кснавсельм A_TINGE  "" ;
кулумавтомо:кулумавтомо ABE-ADJ  "" ;
куцтявикс:куцтявикс A_OSH  "" ;
кучт:кучт A_KIT  "" ;
кяньштимя:кяньштимя A_KUDO  "" ;
лавськурго:лавськург A_PANGO  "" ;
лавшо:лавш A_PANGO  "heikko" ;
ламбамо:ламбам A_PANGO  "makea" ;
лапштаня:лапштаня A_KUDO  "" ;
лембе:лемб A_TINGE  "lämmin" ;
лембе-валдо:лембе-валд A_PANGO  "" ;
лецяк:лецяк A_LAK  "" ;
ливксъюров:ливксъюров A_KAL  "" ;
лишмевтеме:лишмевтеме ABE-ADJ  "" ;
ловалксонь:ловалксонь A-IS-GEN  "" ;
ловсос:ловсос A_OSH  "" ;
лужаня:лужаня A_KUDO  "surullinen (äänestä)" ;
лёмзёрсельме:лёмзёрсельм A_TINGE  "" ;
мазый-паро:мазый-пар A_PANGO  "" ;
марявикс:марявикс A_OSH  "" ;
мастерской:мастерской A_RU-OJ  "" ;
мекарязь:мекарязь A_KAL  "" ;
мельс% каявиця:мельс% каявиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
мельстуиця:мельстуиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
мелявкстомо:мелявкстомо ABE-ADJ  "" ;
монополиянь:монополиянь A-IS-GEN  "monopolistinen" ;
наждачной:наждачной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
наракш:наракш A_OSH  "leikkotukkainen" ;
начко:начк A_PANGO  "kostea" ;
невольниця:невольниця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
незнакомый:незнакомый A_KAL  "" ;
несовет:несовет A_KIT  "" ;
неявикс-редявикс:неявикс-редявикс A_OSH  "" ;
норавтомо:норавтомо ABE-ADJ  "" ;
ношка% преве:ношка% преве A_KUDO  "" ;
нучко-начко:нучко-начк A_PANGO  "" ;
нюрначко:нюрначк A_PANGO  "" ;
образовательной:образовательной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
орвов:орвов A_KAL  "" ;
ордакш:ордакш A_OSH  "" ;
орма-тарва:орма-тарва A_KUDO  "" ;
отьмавтомо:отьмавтомо ABE-ADJ  "" ;
очкопеке:очкопек A_TINGE  "" ;
панок:панок A_LAK  "" ;
паро:пар A_PANGO  "hyvä" ;
партиявтомо:партиявтомо ABE-ADJ  "" ;
парфюмерной:парфюмерной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
пельсверек:пельсверек A_LAK  "" ;
пельсначко:пельсначк A_PANGO  "" ;
песоков:песоков A_KAL  "hiekkainen" ;
петавтомо:петавтомо ABE-ADJ  "" ;
петь:петь A_KIT  "" ;
пештявикс:пештявикс A_OSH  "" ;
пижиксна:пижиксна A_KUDO  "" ;
пильгеалксонь:пильге#алксонь A-IS-GEN  "" ;
письверек:пись#верек A_LAK  "" ;
покойной:покойной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
полгарясельме:полгарясельм A_TINGE  "" ;
пондаз:пондаз A_OSH  "" ;
понкстомо:понкстомо ABE-ADJ  "" ;
принципиальной:принципиальной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
пукшов:пукшов A_KAL  "" ;
пулькасельме:пулькасельм A_TINGE  "" ;
пшти:пшти A_KUDO  "terävä" ;
раськевтеме:раськевтеме ABE-ADJ  "" ;
реалистической:реалистической A_RU-OJ  "" ;
рисэнь:рисэнь A-IS-GEN  "riisi-" ;
сардов-сюрдов:сардов-сюрдов A_KAL  "" ;
сатстовикс:сатстовикс A_OSH  "" ;
связной:связной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
седейтеме:седейтеме ABE-ADJ  "" ;
сееде:сеед A_TINGE  "tiheä" ;
сельмевалдо:сельмевалд A_PANGO  "" ;
сентябрянь:сентябрянь A-IS-GEN  "syyskuinen" ;
серойшть:серойшть A_KIT  "" ;
созма:созма A_KUDO  "" ;
специальной:специальной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
сталмовтомо:сталмовтомо ABE-ADJ  "" ;
сукспряв:сукспряв A_KAL  "" ;
суликасельме:суликасельм A_TINGE  "" ;
сэняждыця:сэняждыця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
сэтьмечивтеме:сэтьмечивтеме ABE-ADJ  "" ;
сюри-буру:сюри-буру A_KUDO  "" ;
сялговтовикс:сялговтовикс A_OSH  "" ;
сёвонень:сёвонень A-IS-GEN  "savinen" ;
сёлмов:сёлмов A_KAL  "" ;
сёрмат-сёрмат:сёрмат-сёрмат A_KIT  "" ;
тарават:тарават A_KIT  "" ;
тарадтомо:тарадтомо ABE-ADJ  "" ;
тарть:тарть A_KIT  "" ;
ташто:ташт A_CHUVTO  "vanha" ;
тейтерьксэнь:тейтерьксэнь A-IS-GEN  "" ;
телешовской:телешовской A_RU-OJ  "" ;
товолдонь:товолдонь A-IS-GEN  "tuolta oleva" ;
тонадкстомо:тонадкстомо ABE-ADJ  "" ;
тувонь:тувонь A-IS-GEN  "sian-" ;
тузов-тазов:тузов-тазов A_KAL  "" ;
тупажа:тупажа A_KUDO  "" ;
тупиця:тупиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
тусто:туст A_CHUVTO  "tiheä" ;
тушто-ташто:тушто-ташт A_CHUVTO  "" ;
тюжолдт:тюжолдт A_KIT  "" ;
тюжт:тюжт A_KIT  "" ;
тюжт-молиця:тюжт-молиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
тюря% начко:тюря% начк A_PANGO  "" ;
узеревтеме:узеревтеме ABE-ADJ  "" ;
укшторонь:укшторонь A-IS-GEN  "" ;
усарафанной:усарафанной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
учовикс:учовикс A_OSH  "" ;
ушонь:ушонь A-IS-GEN  "uiko-" ;
футболонь:футболонь A-IS-GEN  "jalkapallo-" ;
целанек:целанек A_LAK  "" ;
цемстрой:цемстрой A_RU-OJ  "" ;
цецькав:цецькав A_KAL  "" ;
цецят-пецят:цецят-пецят A_KIT  "" ;
цёлак:цёлак A_LAK  "" ;
цёрань:цёрань A-IS-GEN  "miehen" ;
чевте:чевть A_TESHTE  "pehmeä" ;
чевтеойме:чевтеойм A_TINGE  "" ;
чеев:ченгенг A_KAL_Sub  "" ;
чирь:чирь A_KAL  "vino-" ;
чиютконь:чиютконь A-IS-GEN  "" ;
чованя:чованя A_KUDO  "" ;
чувто% юртонь:чувто% юртонь A-IS-GEN  "" ;
шкавтомо:шкавтомо ABE-ADJ  "" ;
штань:штань A-IS-GEN  "" ;
перть:перть A_KIT  "" ;
эмиссионной:эмиссионной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
эрек:эрек A_LAK  "" ;
эрькень:эрькень A-IS-GEN  "järvi-" ;
эрявт:эрявт A_KIT  "" ;
эчке:эчк A_TINGE  "paksu" ;
эчкине:эчкине A_KUDO  "" ;
явовикс:явовикс A_OSH  "" ;
ялгацек:ялгацек A_LAK  "" ;
ятонь:ятонь A-IS-GEN  "" ;
ёжов-важов:ёжов-важов A_KAL  "lempeä" ;
ёнтомо-ёжовтомо:ёнтомо-ёжовтомо ABE-ADJ  "" ;
ёрок:ёрок A_LAK  "" ;
